Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.711

Documents regarding nomination, election, candidacy—Frauds and falsehoods.

Every person who:

(1) Knowingly and falsely issues a certificate of nomination or election; or

(2) Knowingly provides false information on a minor party or independent candidate certificate of nomination is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2013 c 11 s 84; 2004 c 271 s 186.]